Tennessee, session 114, HB1378.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-50-322(a), is amended by adding
the following new subdivision:
(3) Written examinations administered to applicants for a driver license or
intermediate driver license must include questions concerning hand signals used by
operators of bicycles to communicate turning, slowing, and stopping. The department
shall ensure the driver manual used to prepare applicants for the license examination
includes sufficient information concerning such hand signals to enable a reasonably
diligent applicant to correctly answer the additional questions.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect January 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1378
001400
- 1 -